District of Columbia statutes.
50-1805

Public education regarding chapter.

For the first 6 months after April 9, 1997, the Mayor of the District of Columbia shall educate the public about the requirements and the purpose of the Mandatory Use of Seat Belts Amendment Act of 1996. The efforts to educate the public shall be multi-lingual and in alternative formats.

History

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-73, § 6, 32 DCR 6344
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-244, § 2(b), 44 DCR 1155

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1605.

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 6-73

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-1801.